Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1911
Certificate of existence.

(a) Any person may apply to the Secretary of State to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic or foreign corporation.

(b) The certificate of existence shall set forth:

(1) The domestic corporation's corporate name or the foreign corporation's corporate name used in this state;

(2) That (i) the domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of this state, the date of its incorporation, and the period of its duration if less than perpetual or (ii) the foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in this state;

(3) That all fees, taxes, and penalties owed to this state have been paid, if (i) payment is reflected in the records of the Secretary of State and (ii) nonpayment affects the good standing of the domestic or foreign corporation;

(4) That its most recent biennial report required by section 21-19,172 has been delivered to the Secretary of State; and

(5) That articles of dissolution have not been filed.

(c) Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence issued by the Secretary of State may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in good standing in this state.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 11.